Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.086

Elections—Candidates—Filing—Withdrawal—Ballot position.

Each candidate for a city or town elective position shall file a declaration of candidacy with the county auditor of the county in which all or the major portion of the city or town is located not more than sixty days nor less than forty-five days prior to the primary election at which the initial elected officials are nominated. The elective positions shall be as provided in law for the type of city or town and form or plan of government specified in the petition to incorporate, and for the population of the city or town as determined by the county legislative authority or boundary review board where applicable. Any candidate may withdraw his or her declaration at any time within five days after the last day allowed for filing a declaration of candidacy. All names of candidates to be voted upon shall be printed upon the ballot alphabetically in groups under the designation of the respective titles of offices for which they are candidates. Names of candidates printed upon the ballot need not be rotated.

[ 2009 c 107 s 5; 2006 c 344 s 20; 1986 c 234 s 11; 1965 c 7 s 35.02.086. Prior: 1953 c 219 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 107: See note following RCW 28A.343.300.

Effective date—2006 c 344 ss 1-16 and 18-40: See note following RCW 29A.04.311.